Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Article 3. Abandoned Mines.

Administrative Code. —

For abandoned mines, see 11 AAC 90.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The authority to enter into contracts to reclaim abandoned mined land sites is vested in the Department of Natural Resources under AS

27.21.270

—

27.21.340

. It does not vest in the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS 35. August 31, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 27.21.270.
Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund.

The commissioner may take the actions necessary to ensure state participation to the fullest extent practicable in the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund created in 30 U.S.C. 1231 and to function as the state agency for that participation.
In conformity with the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, the commissioner shall

by regulation, establish priorities that meet the terms of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 for the expenditure of money received by the commissioner from the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund;

designate land and water eligible for reclamation or abatement with money received by the commissioner from the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund;

submit reclamation plans, annual projects, and applications to the appropriate authorities under the terms of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977; and

administer money received by the state for abandoned mine reclamation or related purposes from the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.270. Renumbered in 1983.

Editor’s notes. —

The Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 may be found at 30 U.S.C. 1201 et seq.

Sec. 27.21.280.
Eligible land and water.

Land and water eligible for reclamation or drainage abatement expenditures under this chapter are those that were mined for coal or were affected by such mining, wastebanks, coal processing, or other coal mining processes, and abandoned or left in an inadequate reclamation status before August 3, 1977, and for which there is no continuing reclamation responsibility under state or federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.280. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.290.
Entry onto abandoned mine area.

The commissioner may enter real property that has been adversely affected by past surface coal mining practices and other real property necessary for access to adversely affected real property to restore or reclaim the real property or to abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects. The money expended for and the benefits accruing to the real property from work performed under this subsection is chargeable against the real property and mitigates or offsets a claim in or an action brought by an owner of an interest in the real property for damages resulting from the entry. This subsection does not create new rights of action or eliminate existing immunities.

The commissioner may enter real property for the purposes of conducting studies or exploratory work to determine the existence of adverse effects from past surface coal mining practices and to determine the feasibility of restoring or reclaiming the real property or abating, controlling, or preventing the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.

The commissioner may enter real property under (a) or (b) of this section only after

giving notice of the entry by mailing it to the owners if they are known or, if not known, by posting notice on the premises and advertising once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the land is located;

making written findings that

the land or water resources have been adversely affected by past coal mining practices;

the adverse effects are at a stage that, in the public interest, action to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past coal mining practices should be taken; and

the owners of the land or water resources where entry must be made to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past coal mining practices are not known or readily available or will not give permission for the entry.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.290. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.300.
Acquisition of abandoned mine areas.

The commissioner may, by purchase, donation, or condemnation in accordance with AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

, acquire real property that has been adversely affected by past surface coal mining practices if the commissioner determines that

acquisition of the real property is necessary to the successful reclamation of the real property and is in the public interest; and

the real property, after its restoration or reclamation or after the abatement, control, or prevention of the adverse effects, will serve recreational, historic, conservation, or reclamation purposes or will provide open space benefits; and

permanent facilities will be constructed on the real property for the restoration or reclamation of the real property or for the abatement, control, or prevention of the adverse effects; or

if the real property includes a coal refuse disposal site, the acquisition of the coal refuse disposal site and the coal refuse on the site will serve the purposes of this section; or

public ownership is desirable to meet emergency situations created by the adverse effects and to prevent recurrences of the adverse effects.

Title to real property acquired under this section is in the state. If the commissioner acquires the real property by purchase or condemnation, the commissioner shall pay the fair market value of the real property as adversely affected by past coal mining practices.

If real property acquired under this section is suitable for industrial, commercial, residential, or recreational development, the commissioner may sell the real property by competitive bidding, at not less than the fair market value of the real property. The commissioner shall adopt regulations relating to the sale of real property under this subsection that will ensure that the use of the real property is consistent with any state and local land use plans. If money received by the commissioner from the federal government is involved in the acquisition of the real property, the commissioner may sell the real property only if the sale is authorized by the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior. If a person requests it, the commissioner shall hold a hearing in the area in which the real property is located to consider the use or disposition of the real property after its restoration or reclamation or after the abatement, control, or prevention of adverse effects. The commissioner shall hold the hearing at a time that will afford local residents and representatives of municipal government in the area the maximum opportunity to participate in the hearing. The commissioner shall publish notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the real property is located at least 10 days before holding the hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.300. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.310.
Liens on abandoned mine areas.

Within six months after the completion of a project under AS

27.21.290

to restore or reclaim privately owned real property or to abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past surface coal mining practice on privately owned real property, the commissioner shall itemize the money spent on the project. If the project results or will result in a significant increase in the real property’s fair market value, the commissioner may file a statement of the money spent in the recording office in the area in which the real property is located with a notarized appraisal by a licensed appraiser of the fair market value of the real property before the project began. The statement constitutes a lien on the real property as of the date of the expenditure which is second only to the lien of property taxes. The lien may not exceed the amount determined by either of two appraisals to be the increase in the fair market value of the real property as a result of the project. A lien may not be filed under this subsection against real property of a person who owned the surface before May 2, 1977, and who did not consent to, participate in, or exercise control over the surface coal mining operation that necessitated the project.

A person affected by a lien under (a) of this section may petition the commissioner within 60 days after the recording of the lien for a hearing concerning the amount of the lien.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.310. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.320.
Filling voids and sealing tunnels.

The commissioner may authorize the filling of voids, sealing open and abandoned tunnels, shafts, and entryways resulting from any previous mining operation and reclaim surface impacts of underground and surface mines to the extent authorized by the Secretary of the United States Department of the Interior.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.320. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.330.
Emergency powers in abandoned mine areas.

In emergency situations the commissioner may use money available to the state in the Abandoned Mine Reclamation Fund for the purposes of AS

27.21.290(a)

if the commissioner finds that

an emergency exists that constitutes a danger to the public health, safety, or general welfare; and

no other person or agency will act expeditiously for those purposes.

If the commissioner makes the findings described in (a) of this section, the commissioner may enter on real property under AS

27.21.290(a)

or (b) without giving the notice or making the findings required by AS

27.21.290(c)

. An entry onto real property under this section may not be considered a condemnation of property or a trespass.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.330. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 27.21.340.
Miscellaneous powers regarding abandoned mine lands.

The commissioner may request the attorney general to initiate, in addition to any other remedies provided for in this chapter, an action in equity for an injunction to restrain any interference with the exercise of the right to enter or to conduct the work described in AS

27.21.270

—

27.21.340

.

The state has the power and authority to construct and operate plants for the control and treatment of water pollution resulting from mine drainage, including major interceptors and other appurtenant facilities, so long as that control and treatment complies with 33 U.S.C. 1251 — 1376 (the Federal Water Pollution Control Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.45.340. Renumbered in 1983.